Utah statutes.
75-3-907.   Distribution in kind -- Evidence.
If distribution in kind is made, the personal representative shall execute an
instrument or deed of distribution assigning, transferring, or releasing the
assets to the distributee as evidence of the distributee's title to the
property.
